Wisconsin, session 2025, AB82.
do enact as follows:AB82,11Section 1. 77.25 (8) of the statutes is amended to read:AB82,2,4277.25 (8) Between parent and child, stepparent and stepchild, parent and son-3in-law or, parent and daughter-in-law, or grandparent and grandchild for nominal 4or no consideration.AB82,25Section 2. Initial applicability.AB82,2,76(1) This act first applies to conveyances filed on the effective date of this 7subsection.AB82,2,88